New York, session 2025-2026, S834.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. Task force on pandemic learning loss in New York state. 2 There is hereby established a task force on pandemic learning loss in 3 New York state. The purpose of the task force shall be to conduct a 4 comprehensive study on the impacts of remote learning on children 5 enrolled in pre-kindergarten, elementary, and secondary education during 6 the COVID-19 pandemic, including but not limited to: 7 (a) how much regression in reading has occurred; 8 (b) how much regression in math has occurred; 9 (c) how much regression in science has occurred; 10 (d) how many students were disenrolled from schooling; 11 (e) the impact of masking on speech development; 12 (f) the impact of remote learning on children's mental health; 13 (g) the impact of remote learning on standardized test scores; 14 (h) the effectiveness of remote-learning compared to classroom-based 15 learning; and 16 (i) the disparity of the impact on minority communities compared to 17 the impact of remote learning on non-minority communities. 18 2. The task force shall consist of twelve members to be appointed as 19 follows: 20 (a) three members appointed by the Governor; 21 (b) the Commissioner of Education; 22 (c) one member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly; 23 (d) one member appointed by the Temporary President of the Senate; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02777-01-5 S. 834 2 1 (e) one member appointed by the Assembly Minority Leader; 2 (f) one member appointed by the Senate Minority Leader; 3 (g) one member of New York State United Teachers; 4 (h) one member of the New York State School Boards Association; and 5 (i) two members, appointed by the Governor, representing charter 6 schools. 7 3. The members of the task force shall designate one of the members as 8 chair of the task force. All appointments of the members of the task 9 force shall be made no later than thirty days after the effective date 10 of this act. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. 11 The members of the task force shall receive no compensation for their 12 services, but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses 13 incurred in the performance of their duties pursuant to this act. 14 4. The task force shall make a report to the Governor and the Legisla- 15 ture of its findings, conclusions, and recommendations on or before 16 December 31, 2025. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 18 deemed repealed January 1, 2026.